Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,110
Commission; appointments; legislative approval.

All appointments whether initial or subsequent shall be subject to the approval of a majority of the members of the Legislature, if the Legislature is in session. If the Legislature is not in session, any appointment shall be temporary until the next session of the Legislature, at which time a majority of the members of the Legislature may approve or disapprove such appointment.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 110;

Laws 1979, LB 54, § 4;

Laws 1990, LB 534, § 5.